dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="b/ermuċ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ermuċ</l><r>ermuċ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riemeċ</l><r>ermuċ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/aħba__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħba</l><r>aħba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħab</l><r>aħba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pol/za__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>za</l><r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oz</l><r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/anżħa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anżħa</l><r>anżħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nieżaħ</l><r>anżħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/erqa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erqa</l><r>erqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieraq</l><r>erqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tok/ka__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ok</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/enfil__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>enfil</l><r>enfil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niefel</l><r>enfil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/elħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>elħ</l><r>elħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>luħ</l><r>elħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/abib__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>abib</l><r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bieb</l><r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/użżieqa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>użżieqa</l><r>użżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żieżaq</l><r>użżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ixrun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ixrun</l><r>ixrun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>xieren</l><r>ixrun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ikkina__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ikkina</l><r>ikkina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kieken</l><r>ikkina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lti/m__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>m</l><r>m<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ema</l><r>m<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="żib/ġa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ġa</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eg</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/ajt__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ajt</l><r>ajt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jut</l><r>ajt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/artas__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>artas</l><r>artas<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ratas</l><r>artas<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/uħħan__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uħħan</l><r>uħħan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħaħan</l><r>uħħan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħaħen</l><r>uħħan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/israni__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>israni</l><r>israni<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sara</l><r>israni<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bta/la__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jjel</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/uf__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uf</l><r>uf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wief</l><r>uf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ikrah__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ikrah</l><r>ikrah<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>koroh</l><r>ikrah<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ezzun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ezzun</l><r>ezzun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ziezen</l><r>ezzun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kax/xa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>xa</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ex</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/ilda__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ilda</l><r>ilda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lud</l><r>ilda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ertuqa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ertuqa</l><r>ertuqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rietaq</l><r>ertuqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/asġar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>asġar</l><r>asġar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>saġar</l><r>asġar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/olġol__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>olġol</l><r>olġol<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lieġel</l><r>olġol<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/antun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>antun</l><r>antun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>natan</l><r>antun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>naten</l><r>antun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/iħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iħ</l><r>iħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juħ</l><r>iħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/aws__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aws</l><r>aws<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wies</l><r>aws<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/eċpuċa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eċpuċa</l><r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċapaċ</l><r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċiepeċ</l><r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/aħdar__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħdar</l><r>aħdar<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħodor</l><r>aħdar<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/abib__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>abib</l><r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obba</l><r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/isluta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>isluta</l><r>isluta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sielet</l><r>isluta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġiżira/na__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>na</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jjen</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z/opp__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>opp</l><r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>opop</l><r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pup</l><r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/orqom__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orqom</l><r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieqam</l><r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieqem</l><r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/itwa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>itwa</l><r>itwa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiewi</l><r>itwa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aħdar"><i></i><par n="/aħdar__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħajt"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/ajt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="peċpuċa"><i>p</i><par n="p/eċpuċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tabib"><i>t</i><par n="t/abib__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="taxxa"><i>tax</i><par n="kax/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="denfil"><i>d</i><par n="d/enfil__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġuf"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/uf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ltim"><i>lti</i><par n="lti/m__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tertuqa"><i>t</i><par n="t/ertuqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="btala"><i>bta</i><par n="bta/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kaxxa"><i>kax</i><par n="kax/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ikrah"><i></i><par n="/ikrah__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="misluta"><i>m</i><par n="m/isluta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħabib"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/abib__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="masġar"><i>m</i><par n="m/asġar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qaħba"><i>q</i><par n="q/aħba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġolġol"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/olġol__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bezzun"><i>b</i><par n="b/ezzun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xerqa"><i>x</i><par n="x/erqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xiħ"><i>x</i><par n="x/iħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kantun"><i>k</i><par n="k/antun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="polza"><i>pol</i><par n="pol/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qaws"><i>q</i><par n="q/aws__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bużżieqa"><i>b</i><par n="b/użżieqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qartas"><i>q</i><par n="q/artas__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sikkina"><i>s</i><par n="s/ikkina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tokka"><i>tok</i><par n="tok/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bixrun"><i>b</i><par n="b/ixrun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="melħ"><i>m</i><par n="m/elħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="duħħan"><i>d</i><par n="d/uħħan__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zopp"><i>z</i><par n="z/opp__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="konka"><i>kon</i><par n="tok/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żibġa"><i>żib</i><par n="żib/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="borqom"><i>b</i><par n="b/orqom__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bozza"><i>boz</i><par n="pol/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="forka"><i>for</i><par n="tok/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġilda"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ilda__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xitwa"><i>x</i><par n="x/itwa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nisrani"><i>n</i><par n="n/israni__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qanżħa"><i>q</i><par n="q/anżħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="faxxa"><i>fax</i><par n="kax/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fixxa"><i>fix</i><par n="kax/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġiżirana"><i>ġiżira</i><par n="ġiżira/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="borka"><i>bor</i><par n="tok/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bermuċ"><i>b</i><par n="b/ermuċ__n_GD"/></e>
